District of Columbia statutes.
1-1401

Establishment of Office of the Chief Technology Officer.

(a)

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), there is hereby established, in the Executive Branch of the government of the District of Columbia, an Office of the Chief Technology Officer (“Office”) under the supervision of a Chief Technology Officer, who shall carry out the functions and authorities assigned to the Office. The Office of the Chief Technology Officer is established as of July 13, 1998.

(b)

The Chief Technology Officer shall have full authority over the Office and all functions and personnel assigned thereto, including the power to redelegate to other employees and officials of the Office such powers and authority as in the judgment of the Chief Technology Officer is warranted in the interests of efficiency and sound administration.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1812, 45 DCR 7193
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 11B 1981 Ed., see §§ 1412 to 1416 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary addition of §§ 1-1195.1 to 1-1195.5 1981 Ed., see §§ 1412-1416 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and see §§ 1412-1416 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
1981 Ed., § 1-1195.1.
This section is referenced in § 9-1101.01.

“(c) Definition.-For purposes of this section, the term ‘Office of the Chief Technology Officer’ means the office established in the executive branch of the government of the District of Columbia under the Office of the Chief Technology Officer Establishment Act of 1998 ( sec. 1-1401 et seq., D.C. Official Code).”

“(b) Terms and Conditions.-An assignment made pursuant to subsection (a) shall be subject to the same terms and conditions as an assignment made by the head of an agency under this chapter, except that in applying such terms and conditions to an assignment made pursuant to subsection (a), any reference in this chapter to a provision of law or regulation of the United States shall be deemed to be a reference to the applicable provision of law or regulation of the District of Columbia, including the applicable provisions of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 ( sec. 1-601.01 et seq., D.C. Official Code) and section 601 of the District of Columbia Campaign Finance Reform and Conflict of Interest Act ( sec. 1-1106.01, D.C. Official Code).

“(a) In General.-The Chief Technology Officer of the District of Columbia may arrange for the assignment of an employee of the Office of the Chief Technology Officer to a private sector organization, or an employee of a private sector organization to such Office, in the same manner as the head of an agency under this chapter.

“Sec. 3705. Application to Office of the Chief Technology Officer of the District of Columbia.

Section 2909(c)(1) of the E-Government Act of 2002, approved December 17, 2002 (P.L. 107-347; 116 Stat. 2899), states, in relevant part, the following:

Establishment of the Office of the Chief Technology Officer: Section 1811 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided this chapter may be cited as the “Office of the Chief Technology Officer Establishment Act of 1998.”